Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-8]
Timeliness
and scope of application for military-overseas ballot. An application for a military-overseas
ballot shall be timely if received by the request period prescribed under
section 15-4. An application for a military-overseas ballot for a primary
election, whether or not timely, shall be effective as an application for a
military-overseas ballot for the general election and all subsequent elections
held before December 31 of that calendar year. [L 2012, c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next